   #iBird » Feed iBird » Comments Feed alternate alternate

iBird

   Continues to be my favorite
   bird reference app on the AppStore.

   Fantastic app for the amateur
   or more serious birder.

   The combination of drawings and good photo images alone make this worth
   having.

   Thanks, iBird, for making my life complete
   with such an easy-to-use program.

   I've been super happy with this app... and the upgrades
   continue to be great! Worth every penny!

   Thorough, intuitive, great search features
   ... even better than I hoped.

   This creation is simply a fantastic tribute
   to birds and all their beauty.

   Great app. I love it.

   Very pleased with the depth of coverage for each bird,
   similar species, calls and multiple photos.

   Incredible deal, easy search, I'D via songs,
   photos, text, or illustrations.

   Helps greatly in the field,
   especially having song recordings.
   mobile site

Main menu

   Skip to primary content
   Skip to secondary content
     * Home
     * US Products …
          + for iPhone / iPad / iPod Touch
               o iBird Journal
               o iBird Ultimate Guide to Birds
               o iBird Pro Guide to Birds
               o iBird Plus Guide to Birds
               o iBird Canada Guide to Birds
               o iBird Hawaii/Palau Guide to Birds
               o iBird Yard+ Guide to Birds
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds of America
          + for Android
               o iBird Pro
               o iBird Yard Plus
               o iBird Lite
          + for Kindle
               o iBird Pro for Kindle
               o iBird Lite for Kindle
          + for Windows 8
               o iBird Guide to Birds of North America
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
     * UK Products …
          + for iPhone / iPads / iPod Touch
               o iBird UK & Ireland Guide to Birds
               o iBird UK & Ireland Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds: United Kingdom
     * Compare
          + iBird vs the competition (iOS)
          + iBird vs the competition (Android)
          + iBird vs the competition (UK)
          + iBird Journal vs the competition (iOS)
          + Which iBird Version is Right for Me
     * The Press
          + Videos
          + Reviews
          + News
          + iBird and the Evolution of the Digital Field Guide
          + Press Kit
          + The TV Ad
     * Related Sites
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Forum)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, US/CA)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, UK)
          + iBird News, Tips & History
          + Blog
     * Support
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Favorites & Notes Issues
          + Tutorials
               o How to Search
               o Search Attributes
          + FAQs
          + Contact Us
          + About Us
               o Mitch Waite Biography
               o The History of iBird
               o The Future
          + Privacy Policy
          + Comment Policy

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *
     *

     * Compare
     * Reviews from the Experts
     * About Us
     * Contact Us

   Copyright ©2012. Mitch Waite Group. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   | Comment Policy | Sitemap | Mobile site

     * facebook.com/ibird
     * twitter.com/ibird

   myspace live counter
                     Migrating Favorites and Notes Tutorial

   This document is a tutorial on how to migrated the favorites and notes
   you have stored in iCloud to the NEW iBird Pro 7.01 update. First we
   remind you of how you saved favorites and notes in the iCloud then show
   you how to use the new Migration feature in Settings. If you would like
   to know more about how this happened as well as read our apology you
   can jump to the end of this page to And Now a Word From our Sponsor.

How Favorites and Lists were managed in iCloud (iBird Pro 6.11)

     * [Migration iPhone 4-1.jpg]
       Favorites for iCloud are created in More - Settings - iCloud. To
       manage lists tap Select Favorites List.
     * [Migration iPhone 4-2.jpg]
       Here are the three Favorite lists I created. Tap the first Favorite
       list to select it as the current list.
     * [Migration iPhone 4-3.jpg]
       Viewing Favorites List "My Yard Mitch iPhone ATT" looks with its 11
       Favorites.

How to Migrate data in iCloud to iBird 7 Pro device (or Dropbox)

     * [Migration iPhone 5-1.jpg]
       To begin the Migration process, Tap the Menu then Settings.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-2.jpg]
       Next Tap Migrate Old iCloud Favorites/Notes.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-3.jpg]
       If Dropbox is not enabled the Favorites, Note and Favorites Lists
       you had in iCloud will end up on the device. You can enable Dropbox
       anytime and they will be backed up to it. Without Dropbox your Favs
       are NOT backed up. Tap Continue to start transfer.

     * [Migration iPhone 5-4.jpg]
       The transfer over WiFi is normally very fast. If you are using the
       cellular Internet or have a slow WiFi it may take longer. Be
       patient, the more favorites you are moving the longer it will take.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-5.jpg]
       When the migration is complete you will get a message "The
       migration operation completed successfully." Tap OK.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-6.jpg]
       To see that your favorites and lists have migrated tap the Menu on
       the left and tap Favorites.

     * [Migration iPhone 5-7.jpg]
       When you get to the Favorites page, you will only see favorites you
       have recently added to iBird 7 Pro. You won't see any of your
       migrated favorites until you tell iBird what list to use. Tap on
       Manage Lists.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-8.jpg]
       ARE YOUR LISTS BACK? You should see the lists that you had saved in
       iCloud before the update. Tap the list you wish to use now. Then
       tap the Favorites menu to return to the previous screen.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-9.jpg]
       You should see the favorites you had selected for the list in
       iCloud.

     * [Migration iPhone 5-A.jpg]
       Check your Notes and see if they have been restored. If a Note was
       migrated it will have the text at the top "Migrated from iCloud:"
       followed by the note information. In this example there are 2
       observations with dates and the Latitude and Longitude.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-B.jpg]
       Install Dropbox then go to Settings and select Tap to change Sync
       Settings. This will open the Dropbox screen. Assuming you have
       signed up for an account tap Sign in to Dropbox and enter your
       credentials.
     * [Migration iPhone 5-C.jpg]
       Once you have signed in to Dropbox all your Notes, Favorites and
       Favorites Lists will immediately migrate to the folder
       Dropbox/Apps/iBird Pro North America/. Now you can be assured you
       will never lose your Favs and you can share them on any version of
       iBird on any Apple device. All you will need to do is sign into
       Dropbox.

And Now a Word From Our Sponsor

   We Goofed. I would like to take this time to apologize for the trouble
   we caused those of you who rely on Favorites and Notes in iBird, and
   lost them when you updated to the new iBird 7 Pro. There is really no
   good excuse we can offer; we simply rushed out the update too fast.
   Why? We were launching iBird 7 Ultimate, with a number of new features,
   and didn't want our loyal iBird Pro customers to think we were
   neglecting them. Unfortunately our programmer had some critical
   commitments that could not be avoided, and we did not have time to get
   the Migration code working. Looking back we should have held off
   launching iBird Pro 7 until he was available again, and just taken the
   punishment we always get when we launch a new app. By punishment I am
   referring to the people that accuse us of being money grubbing,
   insensitive pond scum, who only care about making a profit and leave
   scathing 1 star reviews on iTunes. We certainly understand how
   frustrating it is to have an update seem to destroy something you love,
   but if we really only cared about making money then why would we update
   iBird Pro sixteen times since May of 2009? There are other things that
   we changed in the iBird 7 Pro update we have taken heat for and I'd
   like to explain what they are and how we are rectifying them.

   Text Colors. While the new update, iBird Pro 7.01, fixes the problem
   for those of you who had saved your Favs in the iCloud it does not
   address the complaint about the white text on a black background. Many
   of you expressed that this combination is just too hard to read and
   wanted the old black text on a white background to be restored. I have
   good news, we are about done giving you the ability to switch between
   the two modes, which we refer to as day or night. Believe it or not the
   white text on a black background is much better for using your app at
   night. It's not only easier on the eyes, the phone generates much less
   light and is much less likely to reveal your presence to the birds you
   wish to identify.

   Save and Load Search. Another feature we left out of this update, and
   will be restoring in a subsequent update, is Save and Load Search. The
   previous Saved Searches were NOT stored in iCloud so they were destined
   to be erased when you updated. This is a legacy condition we could do
   nothing about. We had no idea how people would respond to Saved
   Searches, how many would use them and if they would even be noticed.
   Based on a few of the attack reviews it's clear some people use them a
   LOT. So in a future version of iBird Pro and Ultimate we will restore
   Saved Searches and have them synced to Dropbox so you can share them
   and never worry about losing them again. One reviewer requested that we
   add the ability to save every bird in a search result list to a
   particular favorite list. I just don't see the value of that to the
   majority of our customers. Perhaps this reviewer could post there idea
   on the iBird forum so we can find out if anyone else cares about this
   idea? In fact if you reviewers who like to attack us on iTunes have the
   courage, why don't you jump to this forum and leave your comments and
   ideas, so we can see how many people think like you do? We can have a
   man-to-man debate. And get you out from hiding behind the one-way,
   read-only reviews on iTunes.

   Miscellaneous Changes Coming. Some other things we are going to add to
   the next update are as follows...
     * Keep playing songs or calls when moving to a new page on a species
       account.
     * Go to the Browse-Search page immediately when starting up (you can
       already do this from the Settings but people are missing it.)
     * Add the Sort and View mode feature to the Favorites page.
     * Some surprises we will reveal in the update.

   Those are the main changes you can look forward to in the next update
   of iBird 7 Pro. While we know it's a pain to install such a large app,
   especially if you are on a limited bandwidth Internet plan, we hope
   that this and the next update will get you back to loving iBird like
   you did before. If it doesn't, well there is probably nothing we could
   to do make you happy. :-)

   If you have any questions about the subjects in this page please
   contact us at iBird.com/contact-us.

   This topic is also discussed on our Your iBird Pro Favorites Are Not
   Lost forum.
   #iBird » Feed iBird » Comments Feed iBird » FAQs Comments Feed
   alternate alternate

iBird

   Continues to be my favorite
   bird reference app on the AppStore.

   Fantastic app for the amateur
   or more serious birder.

   The combination of drawings and good photo images alone make this worth
   having.

   Thanks, iBird, for making my life complete
   with such an easy-to-use program.

   I've been super happy with this app... and the upgrades
   continue to be great! Worth every penny!

   Thorough, intuitive, great search features
   ... even better than I hoped.

   This creation is simply a fantastic tribute
   to birds and all their beauty.

   Great app. I love it.

   Very pleased with the depth of coverage for each bird,
   similar species, calls and multiple photos.

   Incredible deal, easy search, I'D via songs,
   photos, text, or illustrations.

   Helps greatly in the field,
   especially having song recordings.
   mobile site

Main menu

   Skip to primary content
   Skip to secondary content
     * Home
     * US Products …
          + for iPhone / iPad / iPod Touch
               o iBird Journal
               o iBird Ultimate Guide to Birds
               o iBird Pro Guide to Birds
               o iBird Plus Guide to Birds
               o iBird Canada Guide to Birds
               o iBird Hawaii/Palau Guide to Birds
               o iBird Yard+ Guide to Birds
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds of America
          + for Android
               o iBird Pro
               o iBird Yard Plus
               o iBird Lite
          + for Kindle
               o iBird Pro for Kindle
               o iBird Lite for Kindle
          + for Windows 8
               o iBird Guide to Birds of North America
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
     * UK Products …
          + for iPhone / iPads / iPod Touch
               o iBird UK & Ireland Guide to Birds
               o iBird UK & Ireland Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds: United Kingdom
     * Compare
          + iBird vs the competition (iOS)
          + iBird vs the competition (Android)
          + iBird vs the competition (UK)
          + iBird Journal vs the competition (iOS)
          + Which iBird Version is Right for Me
     * The Press
          + Videos
          + Reviews
          + News
          + iBird and the Evolution of the Digital Field Guide
          + Press Kit
          + The TV Ad
     * Related Sites
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Forum)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, US/CA)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, UK)
          + iBird News, Tips & History
          + Blog
     * Support
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Favorites & Notes Issues
          + Tutorials
               o How to Search
               o Search Attributes
          + FAQs
          + Contact Us
          + About Us
               o Mitch Waite Biography
               o The History of iBird
               o The Future
          + Privacy Policy
          + Comment Policy

FAQs

Frequently Asked Questions

   Jump to section: General, iPhone, iPad, Android, Kindle, Windows 8,
   Waite’s Guide to Birds of America, iBird Journal

General back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

iPhone back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

iPad back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

Android back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

Kindle back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

Windows 8 back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

Waite’s Guide to Birds of America back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

iBird Journal back to top

Is there any way I could get the APK file for the app I paid for? I want to
see if I can get iBird running on my Playbook.

   APK stands for Android Package (APK) file. It's the file format used to
   distribute and install application software onto Google's Android
   operating system. When you buy an application in the Google Play store
   this is the file that gets downloaded and installed on your device for
   the application. When a developer places his product's APK in the
   Google store the files are encrypted and protected with a special key
   which prevents the file from distributed outside of the Google store.
   This protection feature is called DRM or digital rights management.

   The reason an APK file is protected is to prevent it being given away
   without paying for it. If APKs were not protected anyone could download
   the APK and give to a friend, or even sell it. Companies in business to
   sell an application and make a profit never want to see their APKs
   available outside the Google store.

   Therefore the answer to your question is no, we will not provide a copy
   of our APK file. In fact reverse engineering an APK to remove the
   protection feature is a violation of Digital Millennium Copyright Act
   (DMCA). DCMA is a United States copyright law that criminalizes
   production and dissemination of technology, devices, or services
   intended to circumvent measures (commonly known as digital rights
   management or DRM) that control access to copyrighted works. It also
   criminalizes the act of circumventing an access control, whether or not
   there is actual infringement of copyright itself.

I am having a problem recording GPS locations on my iPad when I away from the
Internet. What is going on?

   If you are using the iPad in the field with neither WiFi or a cellular
   connection to the internet, you may be unable to record GPS locations.
   Apparently there is something about the way the GPS information is sent
   to the program from the iPad that is slightly different from the iPhone
   that is causing this problem. We are working on a solution and hope to
   be sending out a patch soon.

Can I have the unlocked version on two or more iPads?

   You can have the unlocked version of Waite's Guide on as many iPads as
   you wish as long as they all use the same account. Apps are tied to
   accounts not devices.


   Once you have unlocked the app on one device on the 2nd device go to
   the app store and find Waite's Guide or look for it under Purchases in
   the app store. If you are signed in to the same account you will see a
   small cloud where the price usually is. This indicates that the app is
   stored in the iCloud and can be downloaded for no charge. When you have
   finished downloading your version should be unlocked. If it is not go
   to the Unlock button on the Home page and tap it. When the message box
   appears tap the Restore button. It will ask for your username and
   password and when you press OK the app will close the in app purchase
   screen and all the data will be available.

How do I drag a pin on the map?

   Hold you finger down on the red cardinal pin until the location blinks,
   then drag it.

Can I sync my Journal settings and database with another device?

   At this time we do not have a way to sync the settings or database of
   Journal with the app running on another device. We do allow this with
   iBird Pro via iCloud. You can backup your Journal database to Dropbox
   and then open that database from Journal on another device. We do plan
   to add syncing via iCloud but we do not have a date for when this is
   scheduled.

Can I duplicate the same species so I can have a male and female observation?

   Currently you have as many copies of the same species when using Lists
   but not with Checklists. We may allow duplication of the same species
   on Checklists in the future but there are no plans for that now.

I just bought a new Andorid smartphone and when I try to install iBird I get
a Not Compatible message

   Manufactures of Android phones and tablets all license the same exact
   operating system from Google. In order to stand out from their
   competitors, each manufacturer periodically updates the device and its
   OS to add new features. This is not the same as updating the Android OS
   that Google distributes. We are referring to custom changes that fall
   outside of Google's domain. For example the company may add a special
   "skin" which puts a custom software layer on top of the standard
   Android interface. By doing this they can change the way the interface
   looks and responds to user input. Or they may add special hardware,
   such as eye tracking, were the device knows when you have read to the
   bottom of the page by monitoring your eyes, and so can then
   automatically scroll it. All these features are cool, some work an some
   don't, but overall this is great for consumers who delight in
   modernization. However many of these changes have unintended secondary
   effects, such as causing apps that once worked fine to fail, or wearing
   the battery down excessively.


   So when considering buying a new phone or tablet which you wish to run
   iBird on, you need to exercise some cautions. First we advise that you
   first download and install iBird Lite on the new device before you buy
   it. If iBird Lite performs well then it's very likely that iBird Pro
   will work well too, and so safe it's to buy the new phone. If iBird
   Lite fails in some way then its likely the manufacture affected an
   underlying subsystem.


   Here at Mitch Waite Group we try and stay on top of the updates that
   Google makes in their OS (you are probably familiar with the deserts
   they name these versions after such as ice cream sandwich and
   gingerbread.) We can't however anticipate all the changes that
   companies make and that means in some cases the update will break
   iBird.


   We can assure  you that when we do an update we will will try and get
   iBird to comply with as many phones and tables as we can. We send out a
   mailing whenever we do an update to any of our products so as long as
   you have registered you will get a copy of the this email.

I paid $30 for IBird Pro 5. Why must I pay another $20 for an update? Seems
excessive.

   You absolutely do not have to pay for any upgrade to our products.
   There can be several reasons you are not seeing a Download button
   instead of a Buy button.


   It may be that you are not logged into the app store on your iPhone or
   iPad. If  you are not signed into the store there is no way it can tell
   that you already own the app.

   It may be that you are signed into the store but with a different
   account. The only way you can get a free update is if you are updating
   the app on the same account that you bought it with.


   We find that customers often forget what account they used to
   originally buy an app. Or they have several iPhone or iPad accounts. If
   you are not sure which account you used to buy our product look for the
   email receipt that Apple sends whenever you buy an app. The email
   address will be the account you would sign in with.


   You will know you won't be charged for an app when instead of seeing a
   price on the Buy button it says Download.

Do you have a version of iBird Journal for UK?

   At this time iBird Journal only works with North America. We may do a
   version for the UK but we have no schedule for it.

Does the iBird journal cover the whole world or only North America?

   The database of illustrations and range maps is for birds of North
   America, however you can add any species name you wish so it will work
   for any place in the world. The maps are world wide as well. You won't
   have unique icons for the birds you add that are not in the database
   but that is window dressing and won't affect the operation of app.

Is there any way to gift a version I already downloaded to another person?

   Apps are tied to your account so they can't be given away,  gifted or
   loaned. And once an app is updated the earlier versions only exist on a
   customers device and are no longer stored in the iCloud. Thus once you
   update the older version ceases to exist on your device. The only way
   you can share your app is to let someone share you account. This might
   be appropriate between spouses or parents and children.

Does Waite’s Guide use Spanish or French names?

   No the app currently only offers bird names in English. A future update
   may include common bird names in other languages like is found in iBird
   Pro.

Is my iBird Pro HD app now discontinued?

   Yes we did discontinue all three HD apps: iBird Pro HD, iBird Yard+ HD
   and iBird Lite HD. However Apple will keep these apps in the iCloud
   indefinitely and you are still able to download to any iPad.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America for the iPad is our replacement for
   new buyers who are interested in a more powerful high definition app.
   Why did we do this? All three of these HD apps were becoming aged as
   their underlying architecture was based on old technology. We felt that
   it would a mistake to try and upgrade them and what was needed was a
   complete replacement.


   We wish we could have made the Waite's Guide available for free to
   owners of HD products but unfortunately Apple's app store model does
   not support transferring the ownership of one app to a new app. The
   only consolation we can offer is that we will keep the new Waite's
   Guide on sale as long as possible so that prior HD customers can
   painlessly download and enjoy it.

I get an error “In-app purchases not allowed” when trying to unlock the app

   You may have "restrictions" enabled. Go to
   Settings>General>Restrictions>Allowed Content>In-App Purchases and make
   sure restrictions are not enabled.

I have iBird Pro, why do I need Waite’s Guide?

   iBird Pro on the iPhone is the best app when you are out in the field
   and need portability. iBird is our best selling field guide to birds of
   North America for the iPhone. iBird has much of the same content as
   Waite's Guide to Birds of America (WGBA) but because it's on a small
   device you can slip in your pocket, you will most likely always have
   iBird with you. People often say the best camera is the one you have
   with you, and field guide apps follow the same rule. This portability
   makes iBird perfect for field trips. However when you are sitting at
   home using iBird for study the small screen is not ideal. And of course
   iBird is missing many of the powerful features found in WGBA.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America is the best app when you are mainly
   learning about birds. We like to say WGBA is ideal for armchair
   birders. Because it is designed to run on the iPad, with its large and
   high resolution screens, WGBA is not ideal for the field. It's too
   heavy and hard to hold with one hand. But it's the perfect app for the
   study of birds. It is also ideal for identification at home because it
   has a way more powerful search engine (using SAVE) than any bird app,
   including iBird. The search engine takes full advantage of the
   processing power of the iPad CPU and won't work on the iPhone. Waite's
   Guide also has many more features than iBird Pro. Here are a few of
   them:


     * Field Marks on every image that can be turned on or off
     * Topography maps that define anatomy
     * Landscape mode as well as portrait mode which makes for more
       comfortable viewing
     * Advanced slide show that lets you choose any photos, illustrations,
       bird families, artists, photographers and display the accompanied
       by the birds song and call.


   So bottom line is the apps are complementary and have different goals.
   You can't really pick one as being better than the other. For your
   field trips iBird works great since its so easy to carry around. You
   can use it on a iPod touch as well so you don't need an iPhone. While
   you can use the iPad in the field most people find that its kind of
   unwieldy, harder to read in the sun and requires you use two hands to
   operate (one to hold it and one to press buttons).

   Note that the iPad Mini can make a good compromise device since it has
   almost the same portability as the iPhone coupled with the larger
   screen of the iPad.

Do iBird Pro and Waite’s Guide have equal number of birds?

   iBird Pro has 938 species while Waite's Guide to Birds of America has
   919. The reason Waite's Guide has less species is that we have not
   included the 29 species endemic to Hawaii. We plan to create a module
   for Waite's Guide that will include all the endemic species of Hawaii,
   there songs and detailed range maps. This should have about 60 species
   and be available as an in-app purchase at a reasonably low price.

Why does this app only have 50 species?

   Waite's Guide is free because it's a sampler of the full version. The
   sample is made up of 50 species out of a total of 919 or about 5-1/2 %
   of the content. The 50 species have everything found in the full app
   including illustrations, sounds, text data, etc. The search engine in
   the free version allows using any two of the 36 attributes. To gain
   access to the remaining 869 species you make a simple "in-app purchase"
   which unlocks the full content and upgrades the search engine to access
   all 36 attributes you can search on. Our goal in this approach was to
   let you to experience the high quality of the information and
   experience how effective the patented search engine is.


   It was a challenge for us to come up with the right balance of content
   and functionality. There is no perfect formula for obtaining this nor
   is there any course you can take on how to come up with the amount of
   free access. Remember that saying "you can't please all of the people
   all of the time"?  Some people give Waite's Guide a 1 star review
   because because they feel we did not make enough of the content free.
   It's very easy to conclude that these reviewers expect all the content
   to be free! Of course if we gave away all the content we'd be out of
   business in less than a week. So we hope, in the spirit of fairness,
   that before you write a review, you first unlock all the content.


   After this if you still feel that the app is not worthy you are now in
   a good position to state objective reasons, and we can try to improve
   the app to meet your expectations. However if you still feel all
   content should be free we suggest you download an app called Angry
   Birds which provides a great way to vent frustration 🙂

Can you compare iBird Pro to Waite’s Guide?

   You can find comparison tables at the links below.


     * iBird Pro vs. Waite's Guide to Birds of America - compares iBird
       Pro to Waite's Guide.
     * iBird vs. the Competition - compares iBird Pro to the top 4 iPhone
       birding apps.
     * Which version of iBird is right for me? - Compares the 13 different
       iBird apps.

How long does it take to download Waite’s Guide?

   On a fast WiFi it should take less than 15 minutes. On a very slow WiFi
   it can take as long as 3 hours.

Downloading your large app is expensive, any solution?

   Many people today have data plans that limit the amount of data they
   can download per month. Cellular and Satellite based internet ISPs are
   perhaps the worse, in many cases they limit the maximum data from 5 GB
   to 10 GB. Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB it can consume a large portion
   of your allocation.


   Many customers have asked us if Waite's Guide is available on a disk,
   CD or DVD so they can avoid the expensive download. The answer is no.
   The truth is no phone apps are available on disk unless they have been
   hijacked (stolen) and someone goes to the trouble to copy them.


   While we sympathize with the situation, we are compelled to point out
   the cost of software, even including an expensive data plan, is still
   hundreds of percent less than it was 5 years ago.


   The only advice we can offer is to visit a public WiFi hot spot such as
   Starbucks, Barnes and Noble and many others which can be found by doing
   a search on Google for "nearby hotspots".

I paid $24.99 for Waite’s Guide and now its on sale for $9.99 and I am
pissed.

   We are not aware of any industry which make a sale retroactive to
   anyone who paid the full price for a product. With all due respect,
   this is an absurd complaint. A sale is defined as temporarily lowering
   the price of a product. To reimburse people who paid the full price
   every time you had a sale would render the concept of a sale as
   meaningless.

I’m getting a message “insufficient room to install”

   If you get a message indicating there is not enough memory to install
   an app it generally means you need to free up some room on your iPad.
   You can find out how much memory is available by first going to
   Settings->General->About. Look for the caption Capacity, this will tell
   you to the total amount of space your iPad offers. It will always be
   lower than the advertised size for example a 64 GB iPad will show
   approximately 57 GB. The remaining 7 GB is being used by the Apple
   operating system, iOS. Next look for the caption Available. The value
   to the right of Available tells you how much space is available for new
   apps. If this is lower than the size of the app you are trying to
   install you won't be able to install it. You must remove apps, videos,
   songs or photos to make more room on your device.


   Since Waite's Guide is 1.1 GB you might think you only need 2.2 GB
   available to install it. However when an app is being installed it
   makes a copy of itself so  even double it's size (2.2 GB here) may not
   be enough. We suggest you have at least 4 GB available to install
   Waite's Guide.


   Sometimes you still won't be able to install an app, even though you
   appear to have more than sufficient memory. In this case you may need
   to completely restore your iPad.

How do I leave a comment on a species page?

   Open the species you would like to leave a comment for. In the Overview
   section to the right of the illustration you will see a "Recent
   Comments" area. Press the + button to the right of the "Recent
   Comments" heading. The application will prompt you to log in with
   either a Google or Yahoo account. Select either Google or Yahoo and
   then enter your username and password to log in. The application will
   prompt you to enter a comment.  Press "Save Comment" to submit it.

How do I use the SAVE feature of the search engine?

   SAVE stands for "Smart Attribute Value Elimination." It is a patented
   feature of the iBird search engine. SAVE prevents you from selecting
   search criteria that will yield zero results. It works by hiding
   options that do not match any species.

   For example, one of the option in the shape category is
   "Hummingbird-like." If I choose size as "Very Large," and then I open
   the shape category I can no longer see the "Hummingbird-like" option.
   This is because there are no very large birds with the hummingbird
   shape.

How do I uninstall iBird?

   If you are using a mouse, right-click on the iBird tile. A menu will
   pop up at the bottom of the screen. Left-click on the uninstall option.

   If you are using a touchscreen device, swipe the iBird tile upward. A
   menu will pop up at the bottom of the screen. Tap the uninstall option.

I have iBird for either iPhone or Android. Do I have to buy it again for my
Windows 8 device?

   Unfortunately you must purchase iBird for Windows 8 separately. Each
   platform has its own store.

How do I reinstall iBird after I have removed it?

   Make sure you are logged in using the account you used to purchase
   iBird. Open the Windows Store. Swipe downward from the top of the
   screen. A menu will slide down. One of the options will be "Your Apps."
   Select it. You will see a list of all of the apps you have purchased.
   From the pulldown menu in the upper-left corner of the screen make sure
   select the option "Apps not installed on this PC." You will see iBird
   in the list of applications that you have purchased but are not
   installed. Press the iBird tile to install it.

I bought iBird for my Android and had to buy a new phone. Can I install iBird
without having to buy it again?

   Yes, as long as it is another Android device and you use the same
   Google or Amazon account on the new phone that you used on the previous
   phone.

Re-installing iBird on Android

   Before re-installing make sure iBird is completely uninstalled:

   To uninstall an iBird app on your Android, follow the steps below:


   1) Press "Settings" on the home page of your device

   2) Press "Applications"

   3) Press "Manage Applications"

   4) Press the icon that you want to uninstall

   5) Press "Uninstall"

   6) Press "OK"

   7) Press "OK" again


   Then re-install:


   Your application purchases are tied to your Google Account(s) and can
   be installed an unlimited amount of times on any device. So, for
   example, if you remove 'My Favorite Game' to save memory, you can
   reinstall it at a later date with no charge by simply signing into
   your Android Market account and going to My Market Account. Since
   you've already purchased the app, you will see "Purchased" once you
   click on the icon. You just click on the word and the download will
   start.


   If you change devices, you can install previous purchases by making
   sure you sign into your device with the same Google Account (or any
   synced account) you used on your previous phone.

   >

I can’t hear the bird calls

   Each device is different, please look at your device's user manual to
   learn how to operate the sound on your device.

How much space do I need for iBird PRO?

   iBird PRO will use 600 MB after it is installed.  However, you will
   want to have at least 1 GB (One gigabyte – 1,000 megabytes) of space
   available during the installation process for the iBird database. While
   it only uses half that, as it downloads it may put part of the files in
   a temporary part of your memory so at times you may need twice the
   space.

Will iBird work on my device?

   Try downloading the free version- iBird Lite, if it works then all
   iBird versions will work.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be device's memory is corrupted. Close iBird in
   the multitasking tray (double tap the Home button) and try opening
   iBird again. If that fails try rebooting your device. b) Did the app
   start crashing just after you added a new app? Remove that app and see
   if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   There are two ways to backup and restore your Favorites and Notes. The
   best way is to enable iCloud. With release 5.1 and later iBird has
   iCloud support to automatically backup and restore your Favorites and
   Notes. Once enabled you no longer have to go through the time-consuming
   process of manually backing up your Favorites and Notes.


   Backup and Restore Using iCloud


   To enable iCloud support open iBird and tap the “More” button.

   Select “iCloud Settings” from the options on the More page.

   Tap the switch to enable iCloud support for Favorites or Notes or both.

   You will be asked to confirm, tap 'Yes'.


   With iCloud enabled your device will automatically save any Notes or
   Favorites that you create to iCloud when you have an internet
   connection. If your device does not have an internet connection the
   note/favorite will be uploaded when a connection becomes available. Any
   Notes or Favorites that have been lost will be automatically restored
   when you open iBird and have an internet connection.


   To learn more about iCloud please see the FAQ about iCloud or from
   iBird: More>Help>iCloud.


   Backup and Restore Using iTunes


   You can also backup your Favorites and Notes through iTunes:


   Sync your device with iTunes and select iBird under Apps.

   You will see any Favorites or Notes files in the iBird Documents table.

   To backup your files all you have to do is drag them from the iBird
   Documents table to your desktop or destination folder of your choice.


   To restore them you simply drag them back into iTunes to the iBird
   Documents table.


   Please see the Help section in iBird to learn more about creating,
   backing up and restoring iBird Favorites and Notes: More>Help>Favorites
   and Notes.


Can I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

When I tap on iBird nothing happens/iBird crashes immediately after I open
it.

   A crashing app can be the result of several issues. Here are some
   suggestions. a) It may be the device's memory is corrupted.  Try
   rebooting your device. b) Did the app start crashing just after you
   added a new app? Remove that app and see if iBird stops crashing.

How do I backup and/or restore my Favorites and Notes?

   Select the More screen (the More screen is accessible by tapping the
   menu icon). Then tap the Settings menu item. To backup your current
   Notes and Favorites tap the button "Backup Favorites and Notes Data".
   To restore previously saved Notes and Favorites tap the button "Restore
   Favorites and Notes Data".

Can I get a refund?

   Possibly.  Please contact us at support@ibird.com and let us try to
   solve your problem.

If you have a problem with your account (can’t access it or apps disappear,
etc) please contact your app vendor.

   Apple:                   http://www.apple.com/support/mac/app-store/
   Android Market:  http://support.google.com/androidmarket/?hl=en
   Amazon:
   http://www.amazon.com/gp/help/customer/display.html?nodeId=200551840

I have iBird on my iPad, can I load it on my iPhone?

   It depends on what version of iBird you have on your iPad.  If you have
   one of the universal iBird apps then, yes, you can install it on your
   iPhone or iPod Touch.  If you have a native iPad version of iBird:
   iBird PRO HD, iBird Yard Plus HD or iBird Lite HD, then no.  These
   iBird apps were built specifically for the iPad.

What are the differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO HD?

   iBird  Explorer PRO for the iPhone is a "universal" app, meaning it is
   designed for the iPhone sized screen but also can stretch to fit the
   iPad larger screen size.


   iBird PRO HD for the iPad, which we no longer sell, was a native iPad
   app, meaning its interface was designed from the ground up to take
   advantage of the larger-sized iPad screen. So for example the search
   engine on PRO HD showed more information when searching and requires
   less tapping to see the results.


   Please read our Differences between iBird Explorer PRO and iBird PRO
   HD blog post to learn more.


Does iBird need an SD Card?

   iBird does not need an SD card.


   iBird is programmed to install on an SD card if one is present and if
   the device will allow it.  This can create problems in devices that do
   not have an SD card.

   The problem is that the current install expects the storage for our
   database to be named "SD Card" regardless of whether its in a real
   removable card or an emulated area in the memory of the device. What
   happens is some manufacturers use a different name for this area and
   iBird installer gets confused.
   In the most recent version 2.2.1 we made some changes that helped to
   fix this issue but it still comes up now and then. We are working right
   now on a new approach that may get around the naming problem.

Can you help me identify a bird?

   To get a positive ID on your bird please join our “Help Me Identify a
   Bird” forum.  It is loaded with experts that love to ID birds.  It’s
   free to join and easy to use:  Help me ID a bird

Can I identify a bird by its song?

   Unfortunately, searching by sound does not work so well with bird
   sounds. There are some issues that make it very difficult. Bird calls
   and songs are more complex than human speech. Not only does every
   species have a repertory of sounds - no two birds sound alike. Indeed
   the same species of bird in the same area can have different dialects.
   Then there is the problem of the device's microphone, it’s just not up
   to the job of isolating a bird song from background noise. For that you
   need a special parabolic mic and a high gain amplifier with filters to
   remove noise.  We expect someday this will be feasible but for now it
   remains on the wish list for great ideas.

My upgrade to PRO is gone/upgrading on multiple devices.

   Any time there is an update for iBird your iBird will revert to Plus.
   To get it back to PRO simply go through the upgrade process again.  You
   will not be charged.  Similarly if you use iBird on more than one
   device you will need to go through the upgrade process on each device
   but you will only be charged once.

iCloud isn’t working.

   In your device settings tap on iCloud.  Make sure the account
   information is correct and corresponds with the account you purchased
   iBird with and the account information on your other device.  Scroll
   down and make sure "Documents and Data" is on.  Tap on Storage &
   Backup.  Make sure "iCloud Backup" is on.


   In the iBird app under iCloud Settings (from the More page) Make sure
   iCloud Favorites and iCloud Notes are set to ON on both devices.


   After you have enabled iCloud close iBird and turn off your device then
   restart.


   To make sure you have set up your iCloud account correctly here is a
   link to Apple's How to set up iCloud page:
   http://www.apple.com/icloud/setup/


   Here is a link to a discussion forum for people that are experiencing
   problems with iCloud:
   https://discussions.apple.com/message/16388568#16388568

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   Yes.  Sign into iTunes using the Apple ID and password you used when
   you previously installed iBird.  After you click "Buy" and confirm the
   purchase by entering your password, you'll be advised that you've
   already purchased this item. To download it again for free, select OK.

Uninstalling and Reinstalling iBird on your device.

   Uncheck the app's name under the Applications tab for you device in
   iTunes.
   Click Sync (this will uninstall the app on your device).
   Recheck the app's name under the Applications tab.
   Click Sync again to reinstall the app.​

Uninstalling and Reinstalling in your iTunes account

   To uninstall iBird from iTunes go to the LIBRARY in the left hand
   navigation menu. Then select Apps under LIBRARY and you will see a list
   of all your Apps. Now right click on any app you would like to remove
   and select Delete from the drop down menu. Click remove and then click
   Move to Recycle Bin.


   To reinstall iBird in iTunes you'll need to sign into iTunes using the
   same Apple ID and password you used to originally purchase iBird. Since
   you've already purchased it and should have a receipt, you won't have
   to pay for it again. After you click "Buy" and confirm the purchase by
   entering your password, you'll be advised that you've already purchased
   this item. To download it again for free, select OK.


   After you connect your device to your computer, click on your device
   under the section DEVICES. Once you do that, click on the tab that says
   "Apps." You will want to make sure that the iBird app you have
   downloaded is checked so you can sync it.


   Sync your device to your computer.

I am trying to load/update iBird but it seems to be stuck.

   Make sure you have a good WiFi connection, then power down and power up
   your device.  When you restart your device the app will finish
   downloading.

Re-installing iBird on the Kindle

   You can remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, or you can delete
   it from your Amazon.com account. Apps removed from your Kindle Fire
   device are stored in Your Apps and can be downloaded again from your
   Cloud Library.


   If you delete an app from your account, you'll have to purchase the app
   again to re-install it on your Kindle Fire.


   To reinstall a previously purchased app tap Apps from your Kindle Fire
   home screen and select Cloud. Long-press (press and hold) the app you'd
   like to download and select Install.

Uninstalling iBird

   To remove an app from your Kindle Fire device, tap Apps from the Kindle
   Fire Home screen and then tap Device. Press and hold the app you'd like
   to remove and tap Remove from Device.

I can’t update/load iBird.

   If you are having problems updating to iBird 2.2.1 try uninstalling
   iBird, then use a File Explorer app such as  Astro (it's free) to
   locate and remove the iBird_Pro folder.   (To delete the folder hold
   your finger over it until a menu appears to the side, then tap
   delete.)  Then try reinstalling iBird.  Your app purchases are tied to
   your Google Play or Amazon account and can be installed a number of
   times free of charge.

   You will need a Strong WiFi connection to load iBird.

Can I use iCloud to share Favorites and Notes between different iBird
Products on different devices?

   You can use iCloud to synchronize Favorites and Notes between the same
   iBird products on different devices. For example, you can synchronize
   Favorites and Notes between iBird PRO on your iPhone and iBird PRO on
   your iPad. However, you cannot use iCloud to share favorites between
   different iBird products. For example, you cannot synchronize notes
   between iBird PRO and iBird West

How do I use iCloud?

   When activated, iCloud automatically saves all of your Favorites and
   Notes in case a restore is needed at some future date.  It also allows
   you to sync information between devices so that you will have access to
   your Favorites and Notes regardess which device you are using.


   Unfortunately, Apple has not enabled iCloud to give users access to
   their app storage on iCloud.com.  You will not be able to view your
   Favorites and Notes at iCloud.com.  To learn more about iCloud visit
   the Help menu of iBird: More>Help>iCloud

Is there a difference between ibird pro and ibird pro 2 in amazon.com. Which
one do I need for my Kindle Fire?

   iBird pro 2 has been designed especially for the Kindle Fire.

If I have already bought iBird Pro for my android device or my iPhone or
other Tablet can I transfer it to my Kindle Fire?

   No, I am sorry but they have different operating systems.

I bought and downloaded ibird Pro 2 to my Kindle Fire, now what?

   It will take just a few moments and an orange button will appear that
   says "open".

When I tap the icon to start the app the screen goes blank and nothing
happens

   After installing iBird if your screen goes blank (except for a tiny
   image somewhere on the screen) when you tap on the icon to launch the
   app your device may have a setting that needs to be changed.

   On your device go to  Settings.  Click on  Developer Options.  Make
   sure that Force GPU rendering is UNchecked.

iBird isn’t working! Some suggestions from users

   There are now more than 1,200 different Android based smartphones and
   tablets and each manufacturer implements the OS differently. So its
   just impossible for us to guarantee we can get our app to work with all
   of these devices. In the marketplace this is know as "fragmentation"
   and it's a continuing issue with development for the Android OS. We try
   the best we can but in some cases the manufacturer has modified the
   standard way Android works so we are stuck, just like you are, with no
   solution. We are working very hard to solve this problem.


   Whether iBird is freezing, illustrations and other information is
   missing or you can't get the latest version to load or the database to
   sync here are some things fellow iBird users have done to get iBird
   working for them:


     * Force close iBird then restart
     * Reboot your device
     * Clear your device's cache
     * Uninstall iBird then reinstall using a stronger WiFi connection.
       This may mean going somewhere like your local library or simply
       moving closer to your router.
     * Some users have let us know that keeping their device active
       allowed iBird to load.
     * Another user said that repeatedly clearing his device's memory
       during the installation process solved his problem.


   If something else has worked for you please let us know:

   Support@ibird.com

Can I use iBird on my Computer?

   iBird is not available on your computer. However, you can visit
   Whatbird.com. This is a website that has all the features of iBird
   Explorer PRO. You can browse birds and use the search attributes to ID
   them.

Do I need WiFi to use iBird?

   You will need a strong WiFi connection to load iBird.  However, once
   the app has completely loaded and the database has been synced (Android
   versions) iBird will be fully functional without a WiFI or cellular
   connection.

Can I get a refund

   Getting a refund from Amazon can be difficult.  They do not share any
   user information with app developers.  This is great for user's privacy
   but it means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


    Amazon has a No Refunds policy concerning application purchases.
    (Here is a link to Amazon's Digital Content Returns: Amazon Digital
    Content refund policy.)

    However, if you have been unable to use the app or it has disappeared
    from your account they ask that you email them explaining the
    problem. Here are two links to Amazon Customer Service, one is a
    general customer service link the other is for Kindle Fire support.
    There is also a US support # for Kindle Fire users.
    General Support

    Kindle Fire Support

    1-866-321-8851

    While I recently heard from a user saying Amazon was quick and
    helpful you may need to be persistent. You may need to remind them
    that Amazon collected your funds by charging your credit card, the
    app developer did not. As the app developer we have no record of this
    sale.

iBird for other countries

   We frequently receive requests to create an iBird app for other
   countries.

   We are always looking into creating apps for other countries.
   Unfortunately it would take us a long time and a lot of money to create
   the illustrations of the birds for these countries and in the end it is
   often impossible to justify the expense. The biggest hurtle we
   encounter is finding artists in those countries who can, inexpensively,
   provide the art needed for the app.

My iBird Pro 2.0 won’t install – Update to Version 2.2

   If you have purchased iBird 2.0 for your Kindle Fire you may have
   received an error message when you tried to install the app. If so
   please update to the newest version of iBird Pro version 2.2.


    This problem started on July 20, 2012 and both we and Amazon have
    been unable to figure out what caused it. The latest theory is the
    app became damaged on the Amazon servers, but we have no proof.
    However the solution is to uninstall version 2.0 and reinstall the
    new version 2.2. You can determine the version number by going to the
    More page and looking at the very top where it will show About iBird
    2.2.1.


   If you continue to have problems please contact us at iBird Contact Us.

How do I get iBird for Windows 8?

   Download it. http://eightforums.com

How do I do a semantic search with the mouse to get the first letter such as
“M?”

   When you are browsing a list of species, hold down the Control button
   on your keyboard and scroll down with your mouse wheel. You will be
   presented with a list of letters of the alphabet. Select any letter to
   jump to the section containing species that begin with that letter.

Where do I find the Privacy and Comment polices?

   Swipe from the right side of the screen to open the settings menu.
   There you will find the Privacy Policy and Comments Policy.

How do I backup my Favorites and Notes?

   Favorites are automatically stored in "the cloud." There is no backup
   feature for notes at the moment. We may add such a feature in a future
   release.

Can I get a refund?

   If you want a refund, you must contact Microsoft Customer Support to
   see if you are eligible.

How do I unlock Waite’s Guide?

   Once you download Waite's Guide to Birds of America you have free
   access to 50 species. To access to all species you must unlock the app.
   To unlock the app you must get to the in-app purchase screen inside
   Waite's Guide. There are several ways to access this screen but here is
   the simplest:


     * Go to the Home screen and tap the brass colored badge at the bottom
       of the screen which should be displaying UNLOCK ALL SPECIES.
     * A message box will open called Upgrade with 3 buttons at the top,
       from left to right: Not Now, Restore and Buy for $ (Price). The $
       (Price) is the amount you will be charged to unlock all the
       species.
     * This message box explains the process for upgrading, the reasons
       for upgrading, how to contact us if you have any problems and how
       to get a refund from Apple.
     * Tap the $ (Price) button. A message "waiting for store..." will
       appear, followed by a small message box asking you to confirm your
       in-app purchase. You can either Buy or Cancel.
     * Note the amount shown in the Buy button is the actual price you
       will be charged regardless of what you have read elsewhere.
     * Press the Buy button. You will be asked for your Apple ID and
       Password. Type those in and tap OK.
     * If you have already purchased the app you will see a message box
       stating you have already purchased the app and to press OK to
       download it again for free. Since with Waite's Guide you have
       already downloaded the app so pressing the OK button will simply
       unlock all the species in the app.
     * After you press OK the Upgrade screen will be replaced with the
       message All species unlocked and an OK button. Press the OK button
       and the brass badge at the bottom of the screen will say SPECIES
       UNLOCKED.


   If you know you have purchased the app and are simply wanting to
   upgrade it, for example after downloading to a new device, press the
   Restore button. This will check to see if the account you are using on
   the device owns the app and if so it will unlock it. If you are using
   the app on a different account than the one you used to originally
   purchase the app you will be told you don't own it and asked to buy it
   instead.


   Note About Refunds. If you believe you were charged twice for Waite's
   Guide and want a refund you will need to contact Apple to arrange this.
   Developers do not actually sell you there apps, instead they licensed
   it to Apple and Apple charges your credit card. Therefore we did not
   collect your payment nor do we have a way to credit your account. Keep
   in mind that when you signed up to use the Apple app store the
   agreement you checked off was that Apple's would not refund mistakes
   made in ordering in the App store. However while Apple's policy is no
   refunds, if you patiently explain that you made a simple mistake most
   of the time they will make an exception and refund your account.

Can I install iBird on more than one device?

   You can install iBird on up to five of your Windows 8 devices.

Can I copy my Favs & Notes in iBird to Waite’s Guide?

   A Little History

   The simple answer is no you can't copy favorites and notes from iBird
   to Waite's Guide. The reasons why you can't requires you understand a
   little history of our product line. We currently have three products
   that offer backup, export and synchronization features: iBird, iBird
   Journal and Waite's Guide to Birds of America. However at this time
   there is no unifying system for backup, export and synchronization
   between all products and each of these products handles these features
   differently.


   There are several reasons for this but the primary one is when we
   designed iBird Pro in 2008 we had no idea what features people would
   want beyond its basic purpose. Nothing like iBird was on the market; in
   fact it was referred to as "disruptive technology", since it
   essentially replaced the printed field guidebook. iBird's goals were to
   be much more than a book.


   Initially we did not have a way for iBird to save and share anything
   between other versions of iBird or between iBird running on different
   devices. As iBird became more popular we began adding features that
   took it beyond just replacing a book. One of them was Favorites and
   Notes. Our intention for Favorites was a simple way to mark species you
   like similar to the way you dog ear a book's page so its easy to find
   again. The goal for Notes was to leave comments to yourself about a
   species, similar to the way you write in the margins of a book.
   Eventually we made it so Favorites and Notes could be shared between
   iBird on different Apple iOS devices. We used iCloud to accomplish the
   backup and sharing of Favorites and Notes. Later we expanded the
   feature a little more so you could have multiple lists of Favorites.


   iBird Journal was started in 2011. It was aimed at being a powerful
   observation system that would work with iBird as well as any bird
   reference guide app. It was not intended to replace iBird's Favorites
   and Notes feature since those were not designed for managing sightings,
   but rather to provide an app that was made specifically for keeping
   lists of all kinds. (However we discovered later that some customers
   had used Favorites and Notes to serve as a observation system.) We made
   sure that Journal interfaced seamlessly to iBird. We used Dropbox for
   backing up the Journal database and we designed a way for Journal to
   export to and import from eBird. We did not design any system for
   moving Favorites and Notes from iBird to Journal because as we said
   earlier, they were not designed to be used for the same functions.


   Waite's Guide to Birds of America, started in mid 2012, was designed to
   be a stand-alone reference guide app for the iPad with features that
   took it beyond iBird. It is the beginning of a new product line. We
   made sure that Waite's Guide worked well with Journal. But we did not
   design it to work with any version of iBird. Like iBird it did have a
   system of Favorites and Notes that worked exactly the same way, but
   instead of iCloud for backing up Favorites and Notes we used Dropbox.
   We did this so that we could also share photos in a more robust and
   simple to understand manner. We also choose Dropbox over iCloud because
   it is a platform agnostic system, meaning it can be used on non Apple
   projects.


   So the answer to the question "can I copy Favorites and Notes from
   iBird to Waite's Guide" is basically no, you can't. The only way to
   move Favorites and Notes from iBird to Waite's Guide is to manually
   them down or enter them into a spreadsheet and then use that to
   recreate them in Waite's Guide. However if you are using Favorites and
   Notes as a listing system we urge you to use iBird Journal since it was
   designed from the ground up for this specific purpose.


How do I get a refund?

   Getting a refund can be difficult.  Apple does not share any user
   information with App developers This is great for user's privacy but it
   means as an app developer we have no way to issue you a refund.


   Apple has a very strict and confusing refund policy that you agreed to
   when you set up your iTunes account.  Click here to view Apple's refund
   policy http://www.apple.com/legal/itunes/us/terms.html.


   You will need to contact Apple directly for a refund.
   Here are two links to Apple support and their US techincal support #:


   http://support.apple.com/kb/HT1933 (This link shows you how to report a
   problem and request a refund, from within iTunes.)


   https://expresslane.apple.com/GetproductgroupList.do?PRKEYS=131629&loca
   le=en_US (This is a link to Apple's express lane support. You will need
   to select iTunes store and go from there.)


   1-800-275-2273


   Apple's first response will be to deny the refund and refer you to the
   app developer.  You will need to be insistent: Apple collected your
   funds by charging your credit card, the app developer did not.  As the
   app developer we have no record of this sale.  You will most likely
   have to request to speak with a supervisor.  It has been our experience
   that they will eventually give in.

I have iBird for my iPhone and I plan to buy an Android device. Can I use my
iPhone app on the Android (or vice versa)? Can I get a credit for already
making a purchase?

   iBird apps are nontransferable between devices with different operating
   systems. iBird for Apple will not run on an Android device (or vice
   versa) as they are two totally different programs in different
   languages. We will not credit you the cost of iBird if you choose to
   switch devices.

     * Compare
     * Reviews from the Experts
     * About Us
     * Contact Us

   Copyright ©2012. Mitch Waite Group. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   | Comment Policy | Sitemap | Mobile site

     * facebook.com/ibird
     * twitter.com/ibird

   myspace live counter
   #iBird » Feed iBird » Comments Feed iBird » Posts by admin Feed

iBird

   Continues to be my favorite
   bird reference app on the AppStore.

   Fantastic app for the amateur
   or more serious birder.

   The combination of drawings and good photo images alone make this worth
   having.

   Thanks, iBird, for making my life complete
   with such an easy-to-use program.

   I've been super happy with this app... and the upgrades
   continue to be great! Worth every penny!

   Thorough, intuitive, great search features
   ... even better than I hoped.

   This creation is simply a fantastic tribute
   to birds and all their beauty.

   Great app. I love it.

   Very pleased with the depth of coverage for each bird,
   similar species, calls and multiple photos.

   Incredible deal, easy search, I'D via songs,
   photos, text, or illustrations.

   Helps greatly in the field,
   especially having song recordings.
   mobile site

Main menu

   Skip to primary content
   Skip to secondary content
     * Home
     * US Products …
          + for iPhone / iPad / iPod Touch
               o iBird Journal
               o iBird Ultimate Guide to Birds
               o iBird Pro Guide to Birds
               o iBird Plus Guide to Birds
               o iBird Canada Guide to Birds
               o iBird Hawaii/Palau Guide to Birds
               o iBird Yard+ Guide to Birds
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds of America
          + for Android
               o iBird Pro
               o iBird Yard Plus
               o iBird Lite
          + for Kindle
               o iBird Pro for Kindle
               o iBird Lite for Kindle
          + for Windows 8
               o iBird Guide to Birds of North America
               o iBird Lite Guide to Birds
     * UK Products …
          + for iPhone / iPads / iPod Touch
               o iBird UK & Ireland Guide to Birds
               o iBird UK & Ireland Lite Guide to Birds
          + for Native iPad-only
               o Waites Guide to Birds: United Kingdom
     * Compare
          + iBird vs the competition (iOS)
          + iBird vs the competition (Android)
          + iBird vs the competition (UK)
          + iBird Journal vs the competition (iOS)
          + Which iBird Version is Right for Me
     * The Press
          + Videos
          + Reviews
          + News
          + iBird and the Evolution of the Digital Field Guide
          + Press Kit
          + The TV Ad
     * Related Sites
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Forum)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, US/CA)
          + Help Me ID a Bird (Search, UK)
          + iBird News, Tips & History
          + Blog
     * Support
          + iPhone, iPad & Android Forums
          + Favorites & Notes Issues
          + Tutorials
               o How to Search
               o Search Attributes
          + FAQs
          + Contact Us
          + About Us
               o Mitch Waite Biography
               o The History of iBird
               o The Future
          + Privacy Policy
          + Comment Policy

Nothing Found

   Apologies, but no results were found for the requested archive. Perhaps
   searching will help find a related post.
   Search ____________________ Search

   Search ____________________ Search

Recent Posts

     * Time to Buy Apple Stock?
     * Why doesn’t the iBird 3.0 Update work on my device?
     * New iBird for Android Version 2.2.1
     * Adapting iBird to the new iPad Retina Display
     * Chocolate Cheesecake, Apple’s Flat Panel TV and Steve Jobs

Archives

     * April 2013
     * March 2013
     * August 2012
     * March 2012
     * February 2012
     * December 2011
     * November 2011
     * October 2011
     * September 2011
     * July 2011

Categories

     * Amazon Kindle Fire
     * Apple TV
     * Apps for Android
     * Apps for Birding
     * Apps for iPad
     * Apps for iPhone
     * Business
     * iBird
     * Interface Guidelines
     * Macintosh
     * Photos
     * Steve Jobs
     * Successes
     * Teach me birding
     * Techniques
     * Things about the Mac
     * Troubleshooting
     * Uncategorized

     * Compare
     * Reviews from the Experts
     * About Us
     * Contact Us

   Copyright ©2012. Mitch Waite Group. All rights reserved. Privacy Policy
   | Comment Policy | Sitemap | Mobile site

     * facebook.com/ibird
     * twitter.com/ibird

   myspace live counter
